Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 10 BEER
§ 23-1053. Audits of records of licensee.

For the purpose of ascertaining compliance with the provisions of section 23-1047[, Idaho Code,] the state tax commission may, as often as it deems advisable, examine the accounts, records, documents and transactions, pertaining to or affecting the beer business of any person holding a license or certificate or [of] approval issued by this state under the provisions of this act. When examination involving any brewer or foreign distributor holding a certificate of approval issued by this state shall require an examiner to travel outside this state, the actual and necessary expenses of travel and subsistence necessarily incurred on account of the examination shall be paid by the holder of such certificate of approval upon presentation of an itemized statement certified by the examiner and approved by the state tax commission.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1053, as added by 1961, ch. 259, § 1, p. 430.

§ 23-1054. Refund of taxes.

If the tax commission determines that any amount due under this chapter has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the commission shall set forth that fact in its records and the excess amount paid or collected may be credited on any amount then due and payable to the commission from that person and any balance refunded to the person by whom it was paid or to his successors, administrators or executors. The tax commission is authorized and the state board of tax appeals is authorized to order the tax commission in proper cases to credit or refund such amounts whether or not such payments have been made under protest and certify such refund to the state board of examiners.

No such credit or refund shall be allowed or made after three (3) years from the time the payment was made, unless before the expiration date of that period a claim therefor is filed by the taxpayer. The three (3) year periods allowed by this section for making refunds or credit claims shall not apply in cases where the tax commission asserts a deficiency of tax imposed by this chapter and taxpayers desiring to appeal or otherwise seek a refund of amounts paid in obedience to those deficiencies must do so within the time limits elsewhere prescribed by law.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1054, as added by 1986, ch. 73, § 4, p. 201.

§ 23-1055. Unlawful sale, purchases and acts.

It shall be unlawful: (a) for any brewer manufacturing beer outside this state or for any foreign distributor to sell beer for resale or consumption in this state except to dealers and wholesalers licensed in this state; (b) for any dealer or wholesaler licensed in this state to purchase beer manufactured outside this state except from brewers or foreign distributors holding certificates of approval issued by this state and from other dealers or wholesalers licensed in this state; (c) for any person to sell beer for resale or consumption in this state or to transfer or import beer into this state for the purpose of selling such beer for resale or consumption in this state, unless such person shall hold a license or certificate of approval issued by this state pursuant to which any such sale, transportation or importation shall be authorized; (d) for any retailer licensed in this state to purchase beer for resale except from a dealer or wholesaler licensed in this state. Any beer sold, transported or imported in violation of the provisions of this section shall be subject to seizure, forfeiture and sale in the same manner as provided for in section 23-1008[, Idaho Code], as amended.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1055, as added by 1961, ch. 259, § 1, p. 430.

§ 23-1056. Use of alternative method — Time when authorized.

Use of said alternative method of payment of taxes imposed on beer as provided for in sections 23-1047 through 23-1055[, Idaho Code], shall not be authorized until the state tax commission shall adopt and promulgate a regulation permitting use of such method. On and after the effective date of any such regulation use of such alternative method shall be exclusive, provided, however, tax stamps theretofore purchased by any person liable for payment of taxes on beer and on hand may be used by such person and a credit shall be allowed to him against taxes payable with monthly reports subsequently filed in such manner as the state tax commission may prescribe, or said stamp may be submitted for redemption and refund thereon. Upon thirty (30) days written notice mailed to each brewer and dealer licensed in this state and to each brewer and foreign distributor holding a certificate of approval issued by this state the state tax commission may at any time rescind any such regulation and from and after the effective date of rescission only the method for payment of taxes on beer by use of tax stamps as provided for in section 23-1008[, Idaho Code], as amended, shall be used.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1056, as added by 1961, ch. 259, § 1, p. 430.

§ 23-1057. Contract brewing.

A contractee brewer may enter into a contractual relationship with a contractor brewer to contractually produce beer for the contractee brewer to the extent allowed by federal law.

Both the contractee brewer and the contractor brewer shall be separately licensed and separately owned. Beer brewed for a contractee brewer shall count toward the contractee brewer’s annual barrels produced, and such beer shall not count toward the contractor brewer’s annual barrels produced. Each brewer shall be separately and distinctly responsible for compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1057, as added by 2019, ch. 214, § 2, p. 651.